Missouri, session 2026, SB1537.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 135, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 135.1160, to read as
follows:
135.1160. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Department", the Missouri department of public
safety;
(2) "Eligible youth", an individual who is a resident
of this state, has not reached the age of eighteen years as
of the last day of the tax year for which a tax credit is
claimed pursuant to this section, and is claimed as a
dependent on the Missouri income tax return of a taxpayer;
(3) "Qualified firearm safety course", a course of
instruction that meets the minimum training requirements for
a concealed carry permit under section 571.111, or a course
of instruction focused on safe handling, storage, and
operation of firearms and offered by one of the following:
(a) A law enforcement agency located in this state;
(b) A community college or public or private school
located in this state;

SB 1537 2
(c) A firearms instructor certified by the department
or the National Rifle Association; or
(d) The Missouri department of conservation;
(4) "State tax liability", any liability incurred by a
taxpayer pursuant to the provisions of chapter 143 or
chapter 148, exclusive of the provisions relating to the
withholding of tax as provided for in sections 143.191 to
143.265 and related provisions;
(5) "Tax credit", a credit against the tax otherwise
due under chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed
under sections 143.191 to 143.265;
(6) "Taxpayer", any individual that is subject to the
tax imposed under chapter 143, excluding withholding tax
imposed under sections 143.191 to 143.265, who is able to
claim an eligible youth as a dependent for federal income
tax purposes.
2. (1) For all tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026, a taxpayer shall be authorized to claim a
tax credit on the taxpayer's state tax liability in an
amount equal to one hundred percent of the costs incurred
for enrolling the taxpayer's eligible youth in a qualified
firearm safety course, provided that no tax credit shall
exceed one hundred dollars per eligible youth per tax year.
(2) Any amount of tax credit that exceeds the
taxpayer's state tax liability shall be considered an
overpayment of taxes and shall be refunded to the taxpayer.
(3) Tax credits authorized by this section shall not
be transferred, sold, or otherwise assigned.
3. (1) In order to claim a tax credit pursuant to
this section, a taxpayer shall submit the following
information to the department on a form to be provided by
the department:

SB 1537 3
(a) Proof of successful completion by the eligible
youth of a qualified firearm safety course; and
(b) Documentation verifying the costs incurred by the
taxpayer for enrolling the eligible youth in a qualified
firearm safety course.
(2) Upon submission of the information required in
subdivision (1) of this subsection, the department shall
issue the taxpayer a tax credit certificate, which the
taxpayer shall attach to the taxpayer's return.
(3) The department shall maintain on its website a
list of qualified firearm safety courses.
4. The department may promulgate rules to implement
the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
5. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
act:
(1) The program authorized pursuant to this section
shall automatically sunset six years after the effective
date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly;
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of
the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in

SB 1537 4
which the program authorized pursuant to this section is
sunset; and
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section
prior to the date the program authorized pursuant to this
section is sunset.
✓